Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Public  Defense Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Executive Division ....................  $ 3,356,449
(2) Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division................ $ 8,645,518
(3) Appellate Division ..................... $ 28,821,352
(4) Adult Trial Division .................. $329,576,667
(5) Juvenile Trial Division.............. $ 45,417,129
(6) Preauthorized Expenses
Division:
(a) Standard preauthorized
expenses.................................... $ 94,115,182
(b) Temporary hourly increase
program .................................... $ 7,307,131
(7) Court Mandated Expenses
Division:
(a) Standard court mandated
expenses.................................... $ 52,272,158
(b) Temporary hourly increase
program .................................... $ 11,121,931
(8) Trial Representation Division ... $ 18,090,808
(9) Parent Child Representation
Program .................................... $ 46,737,940
(10) Administrative Services
Division:
(a) Administrative services ............ $ 23,808,787
(b) Financial case management
system ....................................... $ 323,866
(11) Special Programs, Contracts
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 1
and Distributions Division:
(a) County discovery
reimbursements ........................ $ 6,348,960
(b) Court-appointed counsel for
protective proceedings .............. $ 1,627,594
(c) Law schools............................... $ 3,437,460
(12) Capital debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 1
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Public Defense
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Juvenile Trial Division.............. $ 7,393,486
(2) Preauthorized Expenses............ $ 1,037,357
(3) Court Mandated Expenses ........ $ 6,547,938
(4) Parent Child Representation
Program .................................... $ 11,684,477
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 2